Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-306
School record; contents.

The school record shall be signed by the teacher and principal of the school which such child has attended and shall be furnished on demand to a child entitled thereto. It shall contain a statement certifying that the child has regularly attended the public schools, or schools equivalent thereto or parochial schools for not less than three-fourths of the school year prior to applying for such school record, and is able to read and write simple sentences in the English language. It shall also state the amount of work completed by such child, measured by the grade of the public day schools in the city or county. Such school record shall also give the age and residence of the child as shown on the records of the school, and the name of its parent, guardian or custodian.

Laws 1907, c. 66, § 6, p. 262;

R.S.1913, § 3580;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 6, p. 553;

C.S.1922, § 7674;

C.S.1929, § 48-306;

R.S.1943, § 48-306;

Laws 1967, c. 296, § 4, p. 807.